Illinois, session 104th, SB230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.3a as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3a)7    Sec. 356z.3a. Billing; emergency services; 8nonparticipating providers.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Ancillary services" means:11        (1) items and services related to emergency medicine, 12    anesthesiology, pathology, radiology, and neonatology that 13    are provided by any health care provider;14        (2) items and services provided by assistant surgeons, 15    hospitalists, and intensivists;16        (3) diagnostic services, including radiology and 17    laboratory services, except for advanced diagnostic 18    laboratory tests identified on the most current list 19    published by the United States Secretary of Health and 20    Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);21        (4) items and services provided by other specialty 22    practitioners as the United States Secretary of Health and 23    Human Services specifies through rulemaking under 42   SB0230- 2 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    U.S.C. 300gg-132(b)(3);2        (5) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 3    provider if there is no participating provider who can 4    furnish the item or service at the facility; and5        (6) items and services provided by a nonparticipating 6    provider if there is no participating provider who will 7    furnish the item or service because a participating 8    provider has asserted the participating provider's rights 9    under the Health Care Right of Conscience Act. 10    "Cost sharing" means the amount an insured, beneficiary, 11or enrollee is responsible for paying for a covered item or 12service under the terms of the policy or certificate. "Cost 13sharing" includes copayments, coinsurance, and amounts paid 14toward deductibles, but does not include amounts paid towards 15premiums, balance billing by out-of-network providers, or the 16cost of items or services that are not covered under the policy 17or certificate.18    "Emergency department of a hospital" means any hospital 19department that provides emergency services, including a 20hospital outpatient department.21    "Emergency medical condition" has the meaning ascribed to 22that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient 23Rights Act.24    "Emergency medical screening examination" has the meaning 25ascribed to that term in Section 10 of the Managed Care Reform 26and Patient Rights Act.  SB0230- 3 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    "Emergency services" means, with respect to an emergency 2medical condition:3        (1) in general, an emergency medical screening 4    examination, including ancillary services routinely 5    available to the emergency department to evaluate such 6    emergency medical condition, and such further medical 7    examination and treatment as would be required to 8    stabilize the patient regardless of the department of the 9    hospital or other facility in which such further 10    examination or treatment is furnished; or11        (2) additional items and services for which benefits 12    are provided or covered under the coverage and that are 13    furnished by a nonparticipating provider or 14    nonparticipating emergency facility regardless of the 15    department of the hospital or other facility in which such 16    items are furnished after the insured, beneficiary, or 17    enrollee is stabilized and as part of outpatient 18    observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with 19    respect to the visit in which the services described in 20    paragraph (1) are furnished. Services after stabilization 21    cease to be emergency services only when all the 22    conditions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(C)(ii)(II) and 23    regulations thereunder are met.24    "Freestanding Emergency Center" means a facility licensed 25under Section 32.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 26Systems Act.  SB0230- 4 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    "Health care facility" means, in the context of 2non-emergency services, any of the following:3        (1) a hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(e);4        (2) a hospital outpatient department;5        (3) a critical access hospital certified under 42 6    U.S.C. 1395i-4(e);7        (4) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 8    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or9        (5) any recipient of a license under the Hospital 10    Licensing Act that is not otherwise described in this 11    definition; or .12        (6) a facility or office in which a patient receives 13    reproductive health care, as defined in Section 1-10 of 14    the Reproductive Health Act. 15    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 16subsection (d) of Section 370g. "Health care provider" does 17not include a provider of air ambulance or ground ambulance 18services.19    "Health care services" has the meaning ascribed to that 20term in subsection (a) of Section 370g.21    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning ascribed to that 22term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 23and Accountability Act.24    "Nonparticipating emergency facility" means, with respect 25to the furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group 26or individual health insurance coverage, any of the following   SB0230- 5 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1facilities that does not have a contractual relationship 2directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer in 3relation to the coverage:4        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;5        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;6        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined 7    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or8        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 9    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 10    hospital.11    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 12furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 13individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 14who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 15indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 16coverage.17    "Participating emergency facility" means any of the 18following facilities that has a contractual relationship 19directly or indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering 20group or individual health insurance coverage setting forth 21the terms and conditions on which a relevant health care 22service is provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 23under the coverage:24        (1) an emergency department of a hospital;25        (2) a Freestanding Emergency Center;26        (3) an ambulatory surgical treatment center as defined   SB0230- 6 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act; or2        (4) with respect to emergency services described in 3    paragraph (2) of the definition of "emergency services", a 4    hospital.5    For purposes of this definition, a single case agreement 6between an emergency facility and an issuer that is used to 7address unique situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or 8enrollee requires services that typically occur out-of-network 9constitutes a contractual relationship and is limited to the 10parties to the agreement.11    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 12facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 13indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or 14individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 15and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 16provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 17coverage. A single case agreement between an emergency 18facility and an issuer that is used to address unique 19situations in which an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee 20requires services that typically occur out-of-network 21constitutes a contractual relationship for purposes of this 22definition and is limited to the parties to the agreement.23    "Participating provider" means any health care provider 24that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 25with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 26health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and   SB0230- 7 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 2to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.3    "Qualifying payment amount" has the meaning given to that 4term in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-111(a)(3)(E) and the regulations 5promulgated thereunder.6    "Recognized amount" means the lesser of the amount 7initially billed by the provider or the qualifying payment 8amount.9    "Stabilize" means "stabilization" as defined in Section 10 10of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act.11    "Treating provider" means a health care provider who has 12evaluated the individual.13    "Visit" means, with respect to health care services 14furnished to an individual at a health care facility, health 15care services furnished by a provider at the facility, as well 16as equipment, devices, telehealth services, imaging services, 17laboratory services, and preoperative and postoperative 18services regardless of whether the provider furnishing such 19services is at the facility. 20    (b) Emergency services. When a beneficiary, insured, or 21enrollee receives emergency services from a nonparticipating 22provider or a nonparticipating emergency facility, the health 23insurance issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured, 24or enrollee shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than 25the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with 26a participating provider or a participating emergency   SB0230- 8 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as 2though the emergency services had been received from a 3participating provider or a participating facility. Cost 4sharing shall be calculated based on the recognized amount for 5the emergency services. If the cost sharing for the same item 6or service furnished by a participating provider would have 7been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the 8cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a lesser 9total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 10enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be liable 11to or billed by the health insurance issuer, the 12nonparticipating provider, or the nonparticipating emergency 13facility for any amount beyond the cost sharing calculated in 14accordance with this subsection with respect to the emergency 15services delivered. Administrative requirements or limitations 16shall be no greater than those applicable to emergency 17services received from a participating provider or a 18participating emergency facility. 19    (b-5) Non-emergency services at participating health care 20facilities. 21        (1) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 22    a participating health care facility and, due to any 23    reason, covered ancillary services are provided by a 24    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 25    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 26    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee shall incur no greater   SB0230- 9 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 2    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 3    for the ancillary services. Any cost-sharing requirements 4    shall be applied as though the ancillary services had been 5    received from a participating provider. Cost sharing shall 6    be calculated based on the recognized amount for the 7    ancillary services. If the cost sharing for the same item 8    or service furnished by a participating provider would 9    have been a flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be 10    the cost-sharing amount unless the provider has billed a 11    lesser total amount. In no event shall the beneficiary, 12    insured, enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan 13    sponsor be liable to or billed by the health insurance 14    issuer, the nonparticipating provider, or the 15    participating health care facility for any amount beyond 16    the cost sharing calculated in accordance with this 17    subsection with respect to the ancillary services 18    delivered. In addition to ancillary services, the 19    requirements of this paragraph shall also apply with 20    respect to covered items or services furnished as a result 21    of unforeseen, urgent medical needs that arise at the time 22    an item or service is furnished, regardless of whether the 23    nonparticipating provider satisfied the notice and consent 24    criteria under paragraph (2) of this subsection. 25        (2) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee utilizes 26    a participating health care facility and receives   SB0230- 10 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    non-emergency covered health care services other than 2    those described in paragraph (1) of this subsection from a 3    nonparticipating provider during or resulting from the 4    visit, the health insurance issuer shall ensure that the 5    beneficiary, insured, or enrollee incurs no greater 6    out-of-pocket costs than the beneficiary, insured, or 7    enrollee would have incurred with a participating provider 8    unless the nonparticipating provider or the participating 9    health care facility on behalf of the nonparticipating 10    provider satisfies the notice and consent criteria 11    provided in 42 U.S.C. 300gg-132 and regulations 12    promulgated thereunder. If the notice and consent criteria 13    are not satisfied, then:14            (A) any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied 15        as though the health care services had been received 16        from a participating provider;17            (B) cost sharing shall be calculated based on the 18        recognized amount for the health care services; and19            (C) in no event shall the beneficiary, insured, 20        enrollee, or any group policyholder or plan sponsor be 21        liable to or billed by the health insurance issuer, 22        the nonparticipating provider, or the participating 23        health care facility for any amount beyond the cost 24        sharing calculated in accordance with this subsection 25        with respect to the health care services delivered. 26    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code,   SB0230- 11 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1except when the notice and consent criteria are satisfied for 2the situation in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), any 3benefits a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives for 4services under the situations in subsection (b) or (b-5) are 5assigned to the nonparticipating providers or the facility 6acting on their behalf. Upon receipt of the provider's bill or 7facility's bill, the health insurance issuer shall provide the 8nonparticipating provider or the facility with a written 9explanation of benefits that specifies the proposed 10reimbursement and the applicable deductible, copayment, or 11coinsurance amounts owed by the insured, beneficiary, or 12enrollee. The health insurance issuer shall pay any 13reimbursement subject to this Section directly to the 14nonparticipating provider or the facility.15    (d) For bills assigned under subsection (c), the 16nonparticipating provider or the facility may bill the health 17insurance issuer for the services rendered, and the health 18insurance issuer may pay the billed amount or attempt to 19negotiate reimbursement with the nonparticipating provider or 20the facility. Within 30 calendar days after the provider or 21facility transmits the bill to the health insurance issuer, 22the issuer shall send an initial payment or notice of denial of 23payment with the written explanation of benefits to the 24provider or facility. If attempts to negotiate reimbursement 25for services provided by a nonparticipating provider do not 26result in a resolution of the payment dispute within 30 days   SB0230- 12 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1after receipt of written explanation of benefits by the health 2insurance issuer, then the health insurance issuer or 3nonparticipating provider or the facility may initiate binding 4arbitration to determine payment for services provided on a 5per-bill or batched-bill basis, in accordance with Section 6300gg-111 of the Public Health Service Act and the regulations 7promulgated thereunder. The party requesting arbitration shall 8notify the other party arbitration has been initiated and 9state its final offer before arbitration. In response to this 10notice, the nonrequesting party shall inform the requesting 11party of its final offer before the arbitration occurs. 12Arbitration shall be initiated by filing a request with the 13Department of Insurance.14    (e) The Department of Insurance shall publish a list of 15approved arbitrators or entities that shall provide binding 16arbitration. These arbitrators shall be American Arbitration 17Association or American Health Lawyers Association trained 18arbitrators. Both parties must agree on an arbitrator from the 19Department of Insurance's or its approved entity's list of 20arbitrators. If no agreement can be reached, then a list of 5 21arbitrators shall be provided by the Department of Insurance 22or the approved entity. From the list of 5 arbitrators, the 23health insurance issuer can veto 2 arbitrators and the 24provider or facility can veto 2 arbitrators. The remaining 25arbitrator shall be the chosen arbitrator. This arbitration 26shall consist of a review of the written submissions by both   SB0230- 13 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1parties. The arbitrator shall not establish a rebuttable 2presumption that the qualifying payment amount should be the 3total amount owed to the provider or facility by the 4combination of the issuer and the insured, beneficiary, or 5enrollee. Binding arbitration shall provide for a written 6decision within 45 days after the request is filed with the 7Department of Insurance. Both parties shall be bound by the 8arbitrator's decision. The arbitrator's expenses and fees, 9together with other expenses, not including attorney's fees, 10incurred in the conduct of the arbitration, shall be paid as 11provided in the decision.12    (f) (Blank).13    (g) Section 368a of this Act shall not apply during the 14pendency of a decision under subsection (d). Upon the issuance 15of the arbitrator's decision, Section 368a applies with 16respect to the amount, if any, by which the arbitrator's 17determination exceeds the issuer's initial payment under 18subsection (c), or the entire amount of the arbitrator's 19determination if initial payment was denied. Any interest 20required to be paid to a provider under Section 368a shall not 21accrue until after 30 days of an arbitrator's decision as 22provided in subsection (d), but in no circumstances longer 23than 150 days from the date the nonparticipating 24facility-based provider billed for services rendered.25    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to change 26the prudent layperson provisions with respect to emergency   SB0230- 14 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1services under the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights Act. 2    (i) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a health care 3provider from billing a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee for 4reasonable administrative fees, such as service fees for 5checks returned for nonsufficient funds and missed 6appointments.7    (j) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a beneficiary, 8insured, or enrollee from assigning benefits to a 9nonparticipating provider when the notice and consent criteria 10are satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5) or in 11any other situation not described in subsection (b) or (b-5).12    (k) Except when the notice and consent criteria are 13satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), if an 14individual receives health care services under the situations 15described in subsection (b) or (b-5), no referral requirement 16or any other provision contained in the policy or certificate 17of coverage shall deny coverage, reduce benefits, or otherwise 18defeat the requirements of this Section for services that 19would have been covered with a participating provider. 20However, this subsection shall not be construed to preclude a 21provider contract with a health insurance issuer, or with an 22administrator or similar entity acting on the issuer's behalf, 23from imposing requirements on the participating provider, 24participating emergency facility, or participating health care 25facility relating to the referral of covered individuals to 26nonparticipating providers.  SB0230- 15 -LRB104 06413 BAB 16449 b1    (l) Except if the notice and consent criteria are 2satisfied under paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5), 3cost-sharing amounts calculated in conformity with this 4Section shall count toward any deductible or out-of-pocket 5maximum applicable to in-network coverage.6    (m) The Department has the authority to enforce the 7requirements of this Section in the situations described in 8subsections (b) and (b-5), and in any other situation for 9which 42 U.S.C. Chapter 6A, Subchapter XXV, Parts D or E and 10regulations promulgated thereunder would prohibit an 11individual from being billed or liable for emergency services 12furnished by a nonparticipating provider or nonparticipating 13emergency facility or for non-emergency health care services 14furnished by a nonparticipating provider at a participating 15health care facility.16    (n) This Section does not apply with respect to air 17ambulance or ground ambulance services. This Section does not 18apply to any policy of excepted benefits or to short-term, 19limited-duration health insurance coverage. 20(Source: P.A. 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 21103-440, eff. 1-1-24.)